Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 3. Equal political rights.

Since equality in the enjoyment of natural and civil rights is only made sure through political equality, the laws of this state affecting the political rights and privileges of its citizens shall be without distinction of race, color, sex, or any circumstance or condition whatsoever other than individual incompetency, or unworthiness duly ascertained by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of guardian or conservator on grounds of incompetency, etc., see §§

3-1-105

and

3-2-101

.

Rights are relative. —

Neither property rights nor contract rights are absolute, but such rights are relative. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

The rights protected by this section are not absolutes, and they do not preclude imposition, by decision or statute, of such reasonable restrictions on those rights as are in the public interest. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Men and women are equal before the law. —

The “equality” provisions of the constitution, this section and art. 6, § 1, emphasize the fact that women in Wyoming are men's equals before the law. State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1950).

Term limit statute unconstitutional. —

Term limit law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

, as it applies to candidates for the state legislature, whether adopted by initiative or legislative action, is unconstitutional and unenforceable because it violates art. 1, § 3 and art. 3, §§ 2 and 52(g), Wyo. Const. No law, whether enacted by the legislature through the legislative process or by the people through the initiative process, may condition political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition such as incumbency. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 3 prohibited the passage of any law conditioning political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition other than those enumerated. Because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

conditioned the right to hold the office of Secretary of State on incumbency, not an enumerated condition, it was unconstitutional. Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14, 294 P.3d 895,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

Municipal election candidacy requirements constitutional. —

Since Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-23-301

does not create a class of persons who must resign their employment before seeking election to municipal office, the statute is not unconstitutional on that ground. Hayes v. City of Sheridan, 2005 WY 10, 105 P.3d 459,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2005).

Workers' compensation. —

The state had a legitimate interest in and rational basis for creating the statutory classification that exempts mobile home parks from mandatory workers' compensation coverage. Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated for equal protection purposes. —

The defendant argued that he was being treated differently from a person who was serving the same amount of time in the state penitentiary because those in prison were afforded opportunities such as good time, vocational and educational programs, merit programs, library and recreational facilities and therapy programs which were not available in the county jail; however, this equal protection claim failed because felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated persons for purposes of identification of a classification of similarly situated persons who are being treated differently. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Purpose of statute must be within scope of police power. —

The due process clause has a substantive aspect as well as a procedural one and in order that a statute may be valid, the purpose, aim or end thereof must be within the scope or purview of the police power. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections is invalid

so far as it relates to elections on propositions to create public debt. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Private School Licensing Act. —

No classification had been created by the Private School Licensing Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

, and it was unnecessary to do any further analysis under the test where those institutions that were already accredited obviously did not have to apply to become accredited, and those institutions that were not accredited had to become accredited within the time frame provided; therefore, no equal protection violation occurred because different classifications were not created under the act or the rules adopted by the Wyoming Department of Education. Newport Int'l Univ., Inc. v. State, 2008 WY 72, 186 P.3d 382,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2008).

Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act (§

9-2-1501

et seq.) (repealed in 2005) is unconstitutional

because it violates the equal protection clause of the state constitution. The act is not rationally related to protection of the public health or economic and social stability of the state. Also, the legislature's use of the law to protect one class of people from financial difficulties, while it dilutes the rights under the constitution of another class of people, cannot be condoned.
Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988).

Professional Review Panel Act unconstitutional. —

The Wyoming Professional Review Panel Act (§

9-2-1801

et seq.) violates the equal protection guarantees of the Wyoming Constitution and is unconstitutional. State ex rel. Wyoming Ass'n of Consulting Eng'rs & Land Surveyors v. Sullivan, 798 P.2d 826,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1990).

Negligence immunity of co-employees unconstitutional. —

The statute which, under the Wyoming worker's compensation scheme, granted immunity from suits by co-employees to employees who were acting within the scope of their employment, §

27-14-104

, is unconstitutional because it violated the Wyoming Constitution's guarantee of equal protection. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992).

Application of the rule against holding incompatible offices,

whether by the common law or legislative enactment, does not result in an unconstitutional infringement of personal and political rights. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Criminal law cannot be lacking in definition. —

The constitutional guarantee of equal rights under the law will not tolerate a criminal law so lacking in definition that each defendant is left to the vagaries of individual judges and juries. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Grand jury constitutional. —

The perceived advantages which flow from the procedure involving a complaint and preliminary examination followed by an information do not justify a conclusion that a defendant is denied equal protection of the law because a grand jury is used. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Statute relating to transfer of prisoners. —

Section 10, ch. 63, Laws 1913, concerning the transfer of prisoners, is not unconstitutional as violating constitutional guarantees of due process, equality of rights or trial by jury with opportunity to defend, nor as permitting exercise of arbitrary power or a delegation of judicial functions to an executive board. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Suspension of license violated equal protection guarantees. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and § 31-7-128(f), which provide for the driver's license suspension of individuals under 19 years of age convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, violate the Wyoming Constitution's equal protection guarantees. Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Seat belt usage provision does not violate equal protection laws. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-1402(f) does not violate the equal protection clauses of either the United States nor the Wyoming Constitutions under rational review basis; the statute's purpose is to encourage seat belt use while limiting the penalties for seat belt nonuse and preserving the right to compensation for accidents caused by negligent tortfeasors, and it is conceivable that § 31-5-1402(f) serves the purposes for which it was enacted. Huff v. Shumate, 360 F. Supp. 2d 1197, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 27781 (D. Wyo. 2004).

Constitutionality of §

14-6-203

. —

The statutory scheme of §

14-6-203

is constitutional; there is no demonstrable prejudice arising out of the failure to assign the burden of proof prior to any hearing; and there was no abuse of discretion on the part of the trial judge in refusing to transfer case to juvenile court or on the part of the trial judge in transferring another case to the county court from juvenile court for a preliminary examination with the view that the case would be prosecuted in the district court. Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995).

Applied

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); Mills v. Reynolds, 807 P.2d 383,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959); Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982); Reaves v. Riley, 782 P.2d 1136,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1989); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991); Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(1924); State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970); Bowers v. Getter Trucking Co., 514 P.2d 837,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1973); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976); Hampton v. State, 558 P.2d 504,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1977); Mayland v. State, 568 P.2d 897,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1977); Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996); Tate v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 932 P.2d 746,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1997); Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Comp. Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For comment dealing with validity of loyalty oaths for candidates, see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

For article, “The Constitutionality of Wyoming's Oil and Gas Compulsory Pooling Provision,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 300.

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For case note, “Legal Interests vs. Relational Interests. Coyne v. State ex rel. Thomas, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979),” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 349 (1980).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Equal Protection Analysis. Awarding Public Works Contracts: Granting Preference to Resident Bidders. Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 393 (1983).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For comment, “Child Custody Arrangements: Say What You Mean, Mean What You Say,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State laws prohibiting sex discrimination as violated by dress or grooming requirements for customers of establishments serving food or beverages, 89 ALR3d 7.

Construction and application of state equal rights amendments forbidding determination of rights based on sex, 90 ALR3d 158.

Prohibition, under state civil rights laws, of racial discrimination in rental of privately owned residential property, 96 ALR3d 497.

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females, 5 ALR4th 708.

Sex discrimination in treatment of jail or prison inmates, 12 ALR4th 1219.

Propriety of automobile insurer's policy of refusing insurance, or requiring advanced rates, because of age, sex, residence, or handicap, 33 ALR4th 523.

Exclusion of one sex from admission to or enjoyment of equal privileges in places of accommodation or entertainment as actionable sex discrimination under state law, 38 ALR4th 339.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance regulating commercial video game enterprises, 38 ALR4th 930.

Propriety of asking prospective female jurors questions on voir dire not asked of prospective male jurors, or vice versa, 39 ALR4th 450.

Tax on hotel-motel room occupancy, 58 ALR4th 274.

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.

Nonconsensual treatment of involuntarily committed mentally ill persons with neuroleptic or antipsychotic drugs as violative of state constitutional guaranty, 74 ALR4th 1099.

Application of statute denying access to courts or invalidating contracts where corporation fails to comply with regulatory statute as affected by compliance after commencement of action, 23 ALR5th 744.

Sex discrimination in law enforcement and corrections employment, 53 ALR Fed 31.

Application of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 USC §§ 1681 et seq.) to sex discrimination in educational employment, 54 ALR Fed 522.

Sex discrimination in United States Armed Forces, 56 ALR Fed 850.

Defense of good faith in action for damages against law enforcement official under 42 USC § 1983, providing for liability of person who, under color of law, subjects another to deprivation of rights, 61 ALR Fed 7.

Public institutions of higher learning as “persons” subject to suit under 42 USC § 1983, 65 ALR Fed 490.

Disparate impact test for sex discrimination in employment under title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC §§ 2000e et seq.), 68 ALR Fed 19.

Award of attorneys' fees under 42 USC § 1973

l

(e), providing for award to prevailing party, other than United States, of reasonable attorney's fee as part of costs in any action or proceeding to enforce voting guaranties of fourteenth or fifteenth amendments, 68 ALR Fed 206.

Who is “prevailing party” for purposes of awards of attorneys' fees under 42 USC § 19731(e), providing for such awards to prevailing parties in actions or proceedings to enforce voting guarantees under fourteenth or fifteenth amendment, 127 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes termination of employee due to pregnancy in violation of Pregnancy Discrimination Act amendment to Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS § 2000e(k)), 130 ALR Fed 473.

Right of action under Title IX of Education Amendments Act of 1972 (20 USCS § 1681 et seq.) against school or school district for sexual harassment of student by student's peer, 141 ALR Fed 407.

Availability of Nominal Damages in Action Under Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USCS §§ 2000e et seq.). 143 ALR Fed 269.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — nonemployment cases 152 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes reverse or majority gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — public employment cases 153 ALR Fed 609.

Actions brought under
42 U.S.C. §§ 1981-1983 for racial discrimination — Supreme Court cases,
164 ALR Fed 483.

What constitutes reverse sex or gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — Nonemployment cases, 166 ALR Fed 1.

Equal protection and due process clause challenges based on sex discrimination — Supreme Court cases, 178 ALR Fed 25.